North Carolina statutes. Chapter 96. Employment Security.
Article 4. Labor and Economic Analysis Division: Job Training, Education, and Placement Information Management.

§ 96-30.
Findings and purpose.

The General Assembly finds it in the best interests of this State that the establishment, maintenance, and funding of State job training, education, and placement programs be based on current, comprehensive information on the effectiveness of these programs
in securing employment for North Carolina citizens and providing a well-trained workforce for business and industry in this State. To this end, it is the purpose of this Article to require the establishment of an information system
that maintains up-to-date job-related information on current and former participants in State job training and education programs.

History.
1995, c. 507, s. 25.6(a).

§ 96-31.
Definitions.

As used in this Article, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the term:

“CFS” means the common follow-up information management system developed by the Labor and Economic Analysis Division under this Article.

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-134, s. 5(b), effective June 29, 2012.

Repealed by Session Laws 2000, c. 140, s. 93.1(d).

“State job training, education, and placement program” or “State-funded program” means a program operated by a State or local government agency or entity and supported in whole or in part by State or federal funds, that provides job training and education
or job placement services to program participants. The term does not include on-the-job training provided to current employees of the agency or entity for the purposes of professional development.

History.
1995, c. 507, s. 25.6(a); 2000-140, s. 93.1(d); 2011-401, s. 2.29; 2012-134, s. 5(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-401, s. 2.29, effective November 1, 2011, substituted “DES” for “the Employment Security Commission of North Carolina as authorized” in subdivision (1); and rewrote subdivision (2), which formerly read: “’ESC’ means the Employment Security
Commission of North Carolina.”

Session Laws 2012-134, s. 5(b), effective June 29, 2012, in subdivision (1), substituted “the Labor and Economic Analysis Division” for “DES”; and deleted subdivision (2), which read: “ ‘DES’ means the Division of Employment Security.”

§ 96-32.
Common follow-up information management system created.

The Department of Commerce, Labor and Economic Analysis Division (LEAD), shall develop, implement, and maintain a common follow-up information management system for tracking the performance measures related to current and former participants in State
job training, education, and placement programs. The system shall provide for the automated collection, organization, dissemination, and analysis of data obtained from State-funded programs that provide job training and education
and job placement services to program participants. In developing the system, LEAD shall ensure that data and information collected from State agencies is confidential, not open for general public inspection, and maintained and
disseminated in a manner that protects the identity of individual persons from general public disclosure.

LEAD shall adopt procedures and guidelines for the development and implementation of the CFS authorized under this section.

Based on data collected under the CFS, the LEAD shall evaluate the effectiveness of job training, education, and placement programs to determine if specific program goals and objectives are attained, to determine placement and completion rates for each
program, and to make recommendations regarding the continuation of State funding for programs evaluated.

The LEAD shall do the following:

Collaborate with the NCWorks Commission to develop common performance measures across workforce programs in the Department of Commerce, the Department of Health and Human Services, the Community Colleges System Office, the Department of Administration,
and the Department of Public Instruction that can be tracked through the CFS in order to assess and report on workforce development program performance.

Determine whether other workforce development programs not participating in CFS should be required to report information and data.

Provide information from CFS to reporting agencies annually.

Provide training for participating agencies to ensure data quality and consistency.

Develop common data definitions that are shared across agencies contributing information to the system.

The Department of Commerce shall ensure that funding and staff resources for the CFS are not diverted to other programs or systems managed by the Department of Commerce.

History.
1995, c. 507, s. 25.6(a); 2000-140, s. 93.1(e); 2001-424, ss. 12.2(b), 20.17(a); 2011-401, s. 2.30; 2012-131, s. 4(a); 2012-134, s. 5(c); 2013-391, s. 8; 2015-241, s. 15.11(d).

§ 96-33.
State agencies required to provide information and data.

Every State agency and local government agency or entity that receives State or federal funds for the direct or indirect support of State job training, education, and placement programs shall provide to the Labor and Economic Analysis Division all data
and information available to or within the agency or entity’s possession requested by the Division for input into the common follow-up information management system authorized under this Article and for such other official functions
as are performed by the Division. The Division of Employment Security shall provide all information in its possession and control requested by the Division in order for the Division to accomplish the purpose set forth in this Article
and such other official functions performed by it.

(a1)
Local school administrative units shall not be required to report directly to the Labor and Economic Analysis Division. The Department of Public Instruction shall be responsible for the collection of information
from local school administrative units for input into the common follow-up information management system authorized under this Article and for such other official functions as are performed by the Division.

Each agency or entity required to report information and data to the Labor and Economic Analysis Division under this Article shall maintain true and accurate records of the information and data requested by the Division. The records shall be open to the
Division for inspection and copying at reasonable times and as often as necessary. Each agency or entity shall further provide, upon request by the Division, sworn or unsworn reports with respect to persons employed or trained
by the agency or entity, as deemed necessary by the Division to carry out the purposes of this Article. Information obtained by the Division from the agency, entity, or the Division of Employment Security shall be held by the Division
as confidential, subject to the State and federal laws governing treatment of such information, and shall not be published or open to public inspection other than in a manner that protects the identity of individual persons and
employers.

History.
1995, c. 507, s. 25.6(a); 2011-401, s. 2.31; 2012-134, s. 5(d); 2013-226, s. 7.

§ 96-34.
Prohibitions on use of information collected.

Data and information reported, collected, maintained, disseminated, and analyzed may not be used by any State or local government agency or entity for purposes of making personal contacts with current or former students or their employers or trainers.

History.
1995, c. 507, s. 25.6(a).

§ 96-35.
Reports on common follow-up system activities.

The Secretary shall present annually by May 1 to the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Agriculture, Natural, and Economic Resources, the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic
Resources, and the Joint Legislative Economic Development and Global Engagement Oversight Committee and to the Governor a report of CFS activities for the preceding calendar year. The report shall include information on and evaluation
of job training, education, and placement programs for which data was reported by State and local agencies subject to this Article. Evaluation of the programs shall be on the basis of fiscal year data.

The Secretary shall report to the Governor and to the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Agriculture, Natural, and Economic Resources, the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic
Resources, and the Joint Legislative Economic Development and Global Engagement Oversight Committee upon the convening of each biennial session, its evaluation of and recommendations regarding job training, education, and placement
programs for which data was provided to the CFS.

History.
1995, c. 507, s. 25.6(a); 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-424, ss. 12.2(b), 20.17(b); 2011-401, s. 2.32; 2012-134, s. 5(e); 2017-57, s. 14.1(q); 2018-142, s. 13(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-401, s. 2.32, effective November 1, 2011, substituted “DES” for “Employment Security Commission of North Carolina” in subsection (a; and substituted “DES” for “ESC” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2012-134, s. 5(e), effective June 29, 2012, substituted “Secretary” for “DES” in subsections (a) and (b).

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 14.1(q), effective July 1, 2017, substituted “the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Agriculture, Natural, and Economic Resources, the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Agriculture
and Natural and Economic Resources, and the Joint Legislative Economic Development and Global Engagement Oversight Committee” for “General Assembly” in subsections (a) and (b).

Session Laws 2018-142, s. 13(a), effective December 14, 2018, substituted “the chairs” for “the the chairs” throughout the section.

§§ 96-36 through 96-39.

Reserved for future codification purposes.